Utah statutes.
10-2-420.   Bonds not affected by boundary adjustments or annexations -- Payment of property taxes.

(1)  A boundary adjustment or annexation under this part may not jeopardize or endanger any general obligation or revenue bond.

(2)  A bondholder may require the payment of property taxes from any area that:

(a)  was included in the taxable value of the municipality or other governmental entity issuing the bond at the time the bond was issued; and

(b)  is no longer within the boundaries of the municipality or other governmental entity issuing the bond due to the boundary adjustment or annexation.

